District of Columbia statutes.
16-3711

Judgment for defendant and determination of damages.

When, in an action of replevin, the issue is found for the defendant, or the plaintiff dismisses or fails to prosecute his suit, or judgment is rendered against the plaintiff on proper motion under rules of court, the judgment shall be that the goods, if delivered to the plaintiff, be returned to the defendant with damages for their detention, or, on failure, that the defendant recover against the plaintiff and his surety the damages sustained by him. The damages shall be assessed by the jury trying the issue; or, where jury trial had been waived, or judgment is rendered against the plaintiff prior to trial on proper motion under rules of court, or he dismisses or fails to prosecute his suit, by a jury of inquest.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 606, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3711.
1973 Ed., § 16-3711.